District of Columbia statutes.
42-1904.16

Judicial review of mayoral actions.

Proceedings for judicial review of mayoral actions shall be subject to and be in accordance with the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act (§ 2-501 et seq.) applicable to “rule-making”; provided, however, that review of mayoral actions pursuant to § 42-1904.06 shall be subject to provisions applicable to “contested cases.”

History

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title IV, § 416, 23 DCR 9532b

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1876.
1973 Ed., § 5-1276.